Washington statutes.
RCW 38.48.050

Acceptance of national defense facilities act.

The legislature hereby expresses its intention to secure to this state the benefits of the act of congress entitled the "National Defense Facilities Act" (10 U.S.C. Sec. 2231, et seq., as amended), and the state military department shall be charged with the duty to cooperate with any official or agency of the United States having powers or duties under the provisions of the said act of congress for the acquisition, construction, expansion, rehabilitation or conversion of facilities necessary for the administration and training of units of the state military department and reserve components of the armed forces of the United States. The provisions of the said act of congress are hereby accepted by this state and this state will observe and comply with the requirements thereof.

[ 1989 c 19 s 61; 1953 c 181 s 1; 1953 c 277 s 4.]